New Jersey, session 222, A1513.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No person shall sell, offer for sale, or transport for sale in the State any milkweed (Asclepias spp.) plant that has been treated with a pesticide determined by the Department of Environmental Protection to be harmful to the monarch butterfly (Danaus plexippus). b.    The Department of Environmental Protection, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including establishing a list of pesticides that are harmful to monarch butterflies. c.    (1)  A person who violates this section shall be liable to a civil penalty of up to $100, to be collected in a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  If the violation is of a continuing nature, each day during which it continues shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.  The municipal court and the Superior Court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999. (2)  The Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Agriculture, and any county or municipality shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.